Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1336
Administrator; appointed; duties.

The board shall retain the services of a full-time administrator to be appointed by the board. The administrator shall hold office at the pleasure of the board. The administrator shall compile a biennial report to be submitted to the board and the Clerk of the Legislature. The report shall set forth the activities, contracts, and projects of the board for the previous biennium and the amount of funds expended. Each member of the Legislature shall receive a copy of such report by making a request for it to the board.

Laws 1993, LB 364, § 7.